Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Registration
§ 31-2-220.
Emergency medical technician's license plates.

Any person certified by the department of health as an emergency medical technician may apply for distinctive license plates for any motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by that person upon registration of the vehicle. These license plates shall be displayed upon the vehicle for which they are issued. The license plates shall bear a distinctive symbol and letters identifying the registrant as an emergency medical technician.

Application for license plates under subsection (a) of this section shall be annually made to the county treasurer as provided by this article. A written statement of eligibility, accompanied by a copy of the applicant’s current emergency medical technician certification, shall be presented to the county treasurer before a license plate or renewal sticker may be issued. Application forms shall be available at all county treasurer’s offices. The normal registration fees and the fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall accompany each application. A person issued distinctive license plates pursuant to this section who is no longer a certified emergency medical technician shall apply for regular license plates pursuant to this article before registration of the vehicle expires.

All applications for special license plates provided by this section shall be made directly to the county treasurer at least thirty (30) days before registration of the vehicle expires. The department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

The special license plates shall be the same size and color as regular motor vehicle license plates but shall be designed so as to indicate that the owner of the motor vehicle is an emergency medical technician and need not include arabic numerals for the county.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 97, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, in (a), inserted “that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle” and “or leased”; and substituted “this article” for “W.S.

31-2-201

” twice in (b).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 97, § 1, and ch. 213, § 1, both added a §

31-2-219

. The provisions added by ch. 97 have been redesignated as §

31-2-220

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 31-2-221.
Prestige license plates.

Excluding dealer, antique, specialty, apportioned, publicly owned vehicle and radio amateur license plates, upon payment of the regular registration fees prescribed by W.S.

31-3-101

and a prestige license plate fee and application to the department, the distinctive license plate number assigned to a vehicle may consist of such combination of alphabetical letters or arabic numerals not currently held nor requested by any vehicle owner in the same county if approved by the department. Application shall be made to the department not later than sixty (60) days before the first day of the annual registration month for the vehicle. An owner having prestige license plates is entitled to the first priority for similar plates upon timely and proper application for license plates. A request for renewal of the registration for the prestige license plate may be made to a county treasurer for issuance of a renewal registration and validation sticker.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1987, ch. 90, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, inserted “antique, specialty, apportioned, publicly owned vehicle” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 3, effective January 1, 2010, amended and renumbered former §

31-2-208

as §

31-2-221

, effective January 1, 2010.

§ 31-2-222.
Radio amateur license plates.

A resident who is the owner of a motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle and who is licensed by the federal communications commission to engage in private and experimental two-way radio operation and holding a bona fide novice class license or higher may apply to the department for radio amateur license plates for one (1) passenger car and one (1) pickup truck only whereby the distinctive license plate number assigned to the motor vehicles shall consist of the figures and letters that make up the call sign of the radio amateur as issued by the federal communications commission. Upon payment of the additional radio amateur license plate fee the department shall furnish radio amateur license plates of such size and design as prescribed by the department to the county treasurer of the county in which the approved applicant resides. The county treasurer shall issue the plates to the applicant upon payment of the regular registration fees. A request for renewal of the registration for the radio amateur license plate may be made to a county treasurer for issuance of a renewal registration and validation sticker. The department may promulgate rules and regulations as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1987, ch. 102, § 1; 1995, ch. 67, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, inserted “that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 16 § 3, amended and renumbered former section

31-2-209

as §

31-2-222

, effective January 1. 2010.

§ 31-2-223.
Antique motor vehicles.

Antique motor vehicles may be registered and licensed pursuant to this section.

The owner of an antique motor vehicle shall register the vehicle within ten (10) days from the date of acquisition of the vehicle by submitting an application to the department indicating:

The owner has resided in Wyoming for at least one (1) year;

The vehicle is owned and operated solely for the purposes of organized antique car club activities, parades, exhibitions, tours and other related activities and will not be used for general transportation;

The vehicle is titled in Wyoming.

Upon receipt of an approved application and payment of fees the vehicle shall be registered and license plates issued therefor. The registration expires upon transfer of ownership of the vehicle. Notwithstanding W.S. 31-2-205(a)(i)(A), a license plate shall only be required to be displayed on the rear of those antique motor vehicles that were originally manufactured to have one (1) license plate.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1995, ch. 3, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, substituted “may” for “shall” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 3, effective January 1, 2010, amended and renumbered former §

31-2-210

as §

31-2-223

.

§ 31-2-224.
Registration exemptions.

The following vehicles are exempt from the provisions of this article:

Transportable homes and the empty frame or frames used to haul transportable homes;

Passenger automobiles or trailers owned by a full-time member of the armed forces of the United States, whether in regular service, organized reserves or national guard, as long as a registration from another state is in effect when the vehicle entered Wyoming and the vehicle is properly registered in accordance with the laws of that state;

Commercial vehicles displaying the registration numbers or plates required by W.S.

31-18-201

and whose operator produces a certificate of registration indicating the vehicle is validly registered pursuant to W.S.

31-18-201

;

Vehicles granted reciprocity pursuant to W.S.

31-2-203

;

Vehicles owned by a nonresident, validly registered in another state or country, displaying registration numbers or plates in accordance with the laws of that state or country and:

Not operated for gain or profit in Wyoming nor used for transportation to or from employment in Wyoming; and

Not owned or operated by a person employed in this state, unless that person is a daily commuter from another jurisdiction which exempts vehicles of daily commuters from Wyoming from registration under a reciprocity agreement;

Not operated primarily by a resident found to be in control of a vehicle under W.S. 31-2-201(o).

Vehicles owned by a nonresident, validly registered in another state or country, displaying registration numbers or plates in accordance with the laws of that state or country and:

Operated primarily by a full-time student at the University of Wyoming, a Wyoming community college or a school licensed in this state offering post secondary education;

Used for transportation of nonresident seasonally employed agricultural workers unless the owner of the vehicle becomes a resident under W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxi)(A); or

Operated primarily by a student enrolled in a post secondary educational institution accredited by a recognized and accepted accrediting agency, or in a parochial, church or religious school as defined by W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iv) offering post secondary education programs, if the institution or school owns or operates an educational program or facility in this state and the student is employed on a temporary basis in that program or facility as part of his educational curriculum.

The following vehicles if validly registered in states contiguous to Wyoming if the contiguous states grant similar exemptions to Wyoming owners of like vehicles:

Trucks, the unladen weight of which does not exceed three thousand five hundred (3,500) pounds; and

Passenger cars while operated by salesmen who make no deliveries.

Mopeds;

Pedestrian vehicles;

Rental vehicles rented in another state or country and validly registered in another state or country, displaying registration numbers or plates in accordance with the laws of that state or country and not being operated for gain or profit in Wyoming nor used for daily transportation to or from employment in Wyoming for a continuous period of more than fourteen (14) days;

Rental vehicles rented in Wyoming from a licensed rental vehicle agency, provided the surcharge is paid pursuant to W.S.

31-3-104

and the vehicle is validly registered in another jurisdiction and displays valid registration or license plates in accordance with the laws of that jurisdiction.

Off-road recreational vehicles are not required to be registered. Off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) shall be registered as provided by W.S.

31-2-232

if they are to be operated on public roadways.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 1; 2017 ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(v)(C).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (b), substituted “are” for “shall,” added “required to” and added the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

“W.S.

31-3-104

,” referred to in this section, was renumbered as

31-19-105

by Laws 2009, ch. 128, § 3.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 1, makes the section effective January 1, 2010.

§ 31-2-225.
Application requirements; contents; weight certificate; title requirement; liability.

Applications for registration of vehicles shall be filed in the office of the county treasurer in person, by regular mail, or if available, electronically, in the county in which the owner of the vehicle resides or in any county in any other case and contain:

Information required by W.S. 31-2-103(a)(i), (ii), (vii) and (ix);

Unladen weight if required to compute fees and taxes;

The purpose for which the vehicle is used and such other information as required by the department or the county treasurer;

Color of the vehicle at the time of registration;

Information regarding whether the owner desires to donate one dollar ($1.00) or more to promote awareness and education efforts for procurement of organ and tissue donations for anatomical gifts;

The option for the owner to donate an additional amount to provide for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system.

The department, county treasurer or any peace officer may cause a truck or trailer to be reweighed at any time and a new weight certificate issued. A copy of the certificate of registration shall be carried at all times in the motor vehicle for which it is valid and shall be displayed upon demand of any peace officer.

County treasurers shall not register nor renew the registration of a vehicle unless a certificate of title has been issued to the owner or the owner presents satisfactory evidence that a certificate of title for the vehicle has been previously issued to the owner by any county clerk except:

A county treasurer may register a vehicle without the Wyoming title of an applicant who is an owner, lessee or operator if the vehicle is required to be registered in Wyoming, and the owner, lessee or operator, if applicable, presents proof from any jurisdiction of a current registration and any other requested documentation from any other source necessary to satisfy the treasurer that the applicant is the owner, lessee or otherwise has lawful right to the vehicle as an owner, lessee or operator.

Applications for a specific license plate number shall be made to the county treasurer by the last day of the annual registration month. The county treasurer shall determine the number of license plates to be reserved for each license plate type, but in no case shall the number reserved for any registration year for any one (1) type exceed nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (9,999).

No motor vehicle shall be registered unless the applicant verifies the motor vehicle is covered by a motor vehicle liability policy in full force and effect in amounts provided by W.S. 31-9-405(b) or a bond on file with the department in amounts provided by W.S. 31-9-102(a)(xi). The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement this subsection. This subsection does not apply to self-insurers under W.S.

31-9-414

. Issuance or renewal of registration by a county treasurer does not constitute verification or certification on the part of the county treasurer that the registered vehicle is in fact covered by required insurance or bond and neither the county treasurer nor any employee of the county treasurer’s office is liable for damages caused by any person operating a registered vehicle in violation of W.S. 31-4-103(a). Proof of insurance shall be carried at all times in the insured vehicle and shall be open for inspection at all times when requested by any peace officer. Any applicant making a false certification required by this subsection or failing to provide proof of insurance on the registered vehicle as required, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable pursuant to W.S. 31-4-103(a) upon conviction.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 1; 2020 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 1, makes the section effective January 1, 2010.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(vi) and made related changes.

§ 31-2-226.
Street rods.

Street rods shall be registered and licensed pursuant to this section.

For any vehicle meeting the definition of a street rod that requires a state assigned vehicle identification number as provided in W.S.

31-11-105

, the model year that is listed on the certificate of title shall be the model year that the body of the vehicle resembles.

To register a street rod, the owner shall submit an application to the department indicating:

The owner has resided in Wyoming for at least one (1) year;

The vehicle will be maintained for occasional transportation, exhibitions, club activities, parades, tours and related activities and will not be used for general daily transportation; and

The vehicle is titled in Wyoming.

Upon receipt of an approved application and payment of the street rod special license fee the vehicle shall be registered and special license plates issued therefor. The department shall issue a special street rod vehicle license plate of a size and design as prescribed by the department. The registration expires upon transfer of ownership of the vehicle or upon the department’s issuance of a new plate design. The department may promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by the laws of this state as a condition of sale for the year listed as the year of manufacture on the certificate of title, the presence of any specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle registered under this section.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 46, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 46, § 1, enacted this section as §

31-2-221

. It has been redesignated as §

31-2-226

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 46, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 31-2-227.
Custom vehicles.

Custom vehicles shall be registered and licensed pursuant to this section.

For any vehicle meeting the definition of a custom vehicle that requires a state assigned vehicle identification number as provided in W.S.

31-11-105

, the model year that is listed on the certificate of title shall be the model year that the body of the vehicle resembles.

To register a custom vehicle, the owner shall submit an application to the department indicating:

The owner has resided in Wyoming for at least one (1) year;

The vehicle will be maintained for occasional transportation, exhibitions, club activities, parades, tours and related activities and will not be used for general daily transportation; and

That the vehicle is titled in Wyoming.

Upon receipt of an approved application and payment of the custom vehicle special license fee the vehicle shall be registered and special license plates issued therefor. The department shall issue a special custom vehicle license plate of a size and design as prescribed by the department. The registration expires upon transfer of ownership of the vehicle or upon the department’s issuance of a new plate design. The department may promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by the laws of this state as a condition of sale for the year listed as the year of manufacture on the certificate of title, the presence of any specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle registered under this section.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 46, § 1; 2015 ch. 34, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (d), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Notwithstanding W.S. 31-2-205(a)(i)(A), for a custom vehicle that was manufactured prior to 1968 or was originally manufactured to have one (1) license plate, a license plate shall only be required to be displayed on the rear of the vehicle.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 46, § 1, enacted this section as §

31-2-222

. It has been redesignated as §

31-2-227

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 46, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 31-2-228.
Embossed license plates.

Any person required to register a vehicle in Wyoming pursuant to W.S.

31-2-201

may apply to the department for embossed license plates for any vehicle owned or leased by the applicant upon registration of the vehicle and payment of the fee required by W.S. 31-3-102(a)(xxii). Application for embossed licensed plates for a previously registered vehicle shall be made at least ninety (90) days before the vehicle’s registration expires.

License plates issued under this section shall be displayed upon the vehicle for which they are issued.

Except as provided in this section, application for issuance and renewal of embossed Wyoming license plates shall be subject to the same requirements and fees as provided in this article. The fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(xxii) shall accompany each application.

The department shall prescribe the design of the embossed plate authorized by this section.

The department may adopt rules and forms as necessary to implement this section.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 164, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 164, § 1, enacted this section as §

31-2-221

. It has been redesignated as §

31-2-228

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 164, § 2, makes the act effective January 1, 2010.

§ 31-2-229.
Special plates; gold star.

Any person required to register a vehicle in Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply to the Wyoming veteran’s commission for a statement of eligibility for distinctive gold star license plates for any motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by that person upon registration of the vehicle. Upon payment of the fee required in W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) by the department, the Wyoming veteran’s commission shall issue a written statement of eligibility for the gold star plate. Only parents, grandparents, spouses, children or siblings of a member of the United States armed forces who died while in service or who died as a result of the service shall be eligible to receive the gold star plates. Application shall be made at least thirty (30) days before registration of the vehicle expires.

License plates issued under this section shall be displayed only on the vehicle for which they are issued.

Except as provided in this section, application for, issuance and renewal of gold star license plates shall be subject to the same requirements and fees as provided in this article.

The department shall prescribe the design of the gold star license plate authorized by this section in consultation with the Wyoming veteran’s commission and shall arrange for production of the license plates. Following initial approval, the gold star license plates shall be subject to redesign on the same schedule as all license plates beginning with the year 2017 reissuance. The license plates shall be issued by the county treasurer of each county.

The department may prepare any special forms and issue rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

The department of transportation shall include within its biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report identifying the actions taken and monies expended pursuant to this section for each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 41, § 1; 2012, ch. 34, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added “children or siblings” in (a), and made related changes.

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote (f).

Editor's note's. —

Laws 2010, ch. 41, § 2, provides: “In the event 2010 House Bill 0027 passes, three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) of the veterans' commission expendable trust fund shall be expended to cover the costs of the gold star license plates authorized under this act for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 41, § 3, makes the act effective January 1, 2011.

§ 31-2-230.
Tribal license plates.

Any person required to register a vehicle in Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply for distinctive Eastern Shoshone Indian tribe license plates for any motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by the applicant upon registration of the vehicle. The department, in consultation with the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Indian tribe, shall prescribe the design of the Eastern Shoshone license plate, which shall include an image of the bucking horse and rider as described in W.S.

8-3-117

, and need not include Arabic numerals for the county. The design of the plate shall comply with any applicable federal or state law.

Any person required to register a vehicle in Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply for distinctive Northern Arapaho Indian tribe license plates for any motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by the applicant upon registration of the vehicle. The department, in consultation with the business council of the Northern Arapaho Indian tribe, shall prescribe the design of the Northern Arapaho license plate, which shall include an image of the bucking horse and rider as described in W.S.

8-3-117

, and need not include Arabic numerals for the county. The design of the plate shall comply with any applicable federal or state law.

The department shall arrange for production of the license plates authorized by this section. The county treasurer of each county shall issue the license plates.

The applicant shall pay an application fee of seventy dollars ($70.00) to the University of Wyoming, whereupon the university shall issue a written statement of eligibility for license plates under this section. Any fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited in equal amounts to the Chief Washakie memorial endowment fund and the Northern Arapaho endowment fund and are continuously appropriated for the purpose of funding scholarships for students at the University of Wyoming.

Applicants shall apply at least thirty (30) days before registration is required for the vehicle for which the plates are intended. Except as provided in this section, application for, issuance and renewal of license plates under this section shall be subject to the same requirements and fees as provided in this article in addition to the application fee in subsection (d). The license plate fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall accompany each application.

License plates issued under this section shall be displayed only upon the vehicle for which they are issued.

The department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

Unless five hundred (500) sets of license plates are issued under this section before December 31, 2025, the plates authorized under this section shall be eliminated from production, and the department shall report the cessation of production to the legislature not later than January 15, 2027.

History.

2017 ch. 80, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 80, § 2, makes the act effective January 1, 2018.

§ 31-2-231.
Wildlife conservation license plates; wildlife conservation account; authority to receive and expend monies.

Any person required to register a vehicle in Wyoming pursuant to this article may apply to the department for a statement of eligibility for wildlife conservation license plates for any motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle owned or leased by that person upon registration of the vehicle. The department may include as part of the application the option for the applicant to donate an additional amount in support of wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system. Upon payment by the applicant of a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) to the department, plus any additional voluntary amount, the department shall issue a written statement of eligibility for wildlife conservation license plates. The department shall assess an annual fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a person to retain eligibility for wildlife conservation plates, but this annual fee shall not be charged in the year the person pays the one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) eligibility fee. The person may submit an additional voluntary amount in support of wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system when remitting the annual fee.

The fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be payable to the department and shall be accounted for separately. Except as otherwise provided by law, the fees collected under subsection (a) of this section and funds collected under W.S. 23-2-101(p), 23-2-201(h), 23-2-306(d), 24-1-131(b), 31-2-225(a)(vi), 31-2-404(f)(ii), 31-2-409(h)(ii), 31-2-703(e)(ii), 31-3-101(j), 31-7-111(b)(xiv) and 36-4-121(t) shall be distributed to the wildlife conservation account within the state highway fund, which is hereby created. The wildlife conservation account shall be administered in accordance with the following:

Funds in the wildlife conservation account are continuously appropriated to the department and shall only be used to provide for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system, including signage, wildlife corridors, wildlife crossings and game fences. Money received and the proceeds or other property likewise received and disposed of by the department may, in consultation with the Wyoming transportation commission, be expended by the department for the purposes of this section;

The department may establish methods to accept voluntary contributions in support of wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system for deposit into the wildlife conservation account. The department may suggest and solicit specific contribution amounts;

The department, in consultation with the Wyoming transportation commission, is authorized to receive and credit to the wildlife conservation account, any money or property of any kind or character donated, granted or bequeathed to the Wyoming transportation commission, the department or the state of Wyoming for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system. The department, in consultation with the Wyoming transportation commission, shall have the authority to carry out the terms, if any, of the grant, donation or bequest, or in the absence of any terms or limitations, to expend the money or the proceeds of the property as it may deem advisable for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system under the provisions of this section;

The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to receive and credit to the wildlife conservation account any grant, donation or bequest that is made to the Wyoming transportation commission, the department or the state of Wyoming for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system to be expended for the purposes provided by this section. The state treasurer shall invest any money received under this paragraph in accordance with law and the investment earnings received thereon shall be deposited into the wildlife conservation account.

Applicants shall apply at least thirty (30) days before registration is required for the vehicle for which the plates are intended. Except as provided in this section, application for, issuance and renewal of the wildlife conservation license plates under this section shall be subject to the same requirements and fees as provided in this article in addition to the fee collected under subsection (a) of this section. The license plate fees required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall accompany each application. The license plates under this section shall be issued by the county treasurer of each county and shall be displayed only upon the vehicle for which they are issued.

The department shall prescribe the design of the wildlife conservation license plates authorized by this section in consultation with the public and other interested parties, which shall include an image of the bucking horse and rider described in W.S.

8-3-117

. License plates authorized by this section need not include Arabic numerals designating the county. The department shall arrange for production of the license plates. Following initial approval, wildlife conservation license plates shall be subject to redesign on the same schedule as all license plates beginning with the year 2025 reissuance.

The department may prepare any special forms and promulgate any rules necessary to carry out this section.

Unless one thousand (1,000) sets of license plates are issued under this section before December 31, 2023, the plates authorized under this section shall be eliminated from production and the department shall report the cessation of production to the legislature not later than January 15, 2025.

History.

2018 ch. 72, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 5, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 5, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a), added the second sentence, added “plus any additional voluntary amount” following “to the department,” and rewrote (b) which read: “The fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be payable to the department and shall be accounted for separately. The fees collected shall be distributed to the wildlife conservation account within the state highway fund, which is hereby created. Funds in the wildlife conservation account shall only be used to provide for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system, including signage, wildlife corridors, wildlife crossings and game fences.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “The fees collected under subsection (a) of this section and funds collected under W.S. 31-2-225(a)(vi), 31-2-404(f)(ii), 31-2-409(h)(ii), 31-2-703(e)(ii), 31-3-101(j) and 31-7-111(b)(xiv) shall” for “The fees collected shall.”

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “Except as otherwise provided by law, the fees collected under subsection (a) of this section and funds collected under W.S. 23-2-101(p), 23-2-201(h), 23-2-306(d), 24-1-131(b) and 36-4-121(t) shall” for “The fees collected shall.”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 72, § 4(a), makes the act effective January 1, 2019.

§ 31-2-232.
Specified off-road vehicle licensing and registration.

Off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) may be registered and licensed pursuant to this section.

Before the owner of an off-road recreational vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) may operate the vehicle upon any public road, except pursuant to W.S. 31-5-1601(a) through (c), the owner shall register the vehicle by submitting an application to the county treasurer indicating:

The owner wishes to operate the vehicle upon public roadways in Wyoming;

The vehicle is owned and operated primarily for the purposes of off-road recreational use or other related activities and will not be used primarily for general transportation upon public roadways;

The vehicle is titled in Wyoming;

The applicant has certified on a form created by the department that the vehicle has the equipment required by W.S. 31-5-912(b), 31-5-913(a) and (b),

31-5-914

, 31-5-915(a),

31-5-917

,

31-5-952

,

31-5-953

, 31-5-954(a),

31-5-956

and 31-5-1601(a)(iv) and (v)(B).

Upon receipt of an approved application and payment of fees the county treasurer shall issue to the applicant a certificate of registration together with one (1) license plate or validation sticker. The registration fee for off-road recreational vehicles shall be the same rate as for motorcycles. The registration expires annually in accordance with W.S. 31-2-206(a) and upon transfer of ownership of the vehicle. License plates on the off-road recreational vehicle shall be displayed in accordance with W.S.

31-2-205

.

History.

2021 ch. 34, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 32, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

added “annually in accordance with W.S. 31-2-206(a) and” in the third sentence of (c).

Laws 2022, ch. 32, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 34, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note. —

Laws 2022, ch. 32, § 2, provides, “This act applies to all off-road recreational vehicles as defined in
W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) as of the effective date of this act. If between July 1, 2021 and the effective date of this act an owner registered an off-road recreational vehicle as defined in
W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) in accordance with W.S. 31-2-232(c), the vehicle may continue to operate using that registration, and that registration shall expire only upon transfer of ownership of the vehicle.”